Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Chapter 7 Relocation Assistance

Cross references. —

As to eminent domain generally, see chapter 26 of title 1.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Eminent Domain Act: Comment on the Act and Rule 71.1 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 739 (1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Valuation of land and improvements and fixtures thereon separately or as unit, 1 ALR2d 878.

Constitutional rights of owner as against destruction of building by public authorities, 14 ALR2d 73.

Rights in respect of real estate taxes, 45 ALR2d 522.

Cost to property owner of moving personal property as element of damages or compensation, 69 ALR2d 1453.

Rights in condemnation award where land taken was subject to possible rights of reverter or reentry, 81 ALR2d 568.

Right of holder of unexercised option to purchase to damages or compensation upon condemnation of property, 85 ALR2d 588.

Who, as between condemnor and condemnee, bears risk of loss or destruction of property occurring after commencement but before completion of eminent domain proceedings, 89 ALR2d 1076.

Permissible modes of service of notice of eminent domain proceedings, 89 ALR2d 1404.

Distribution as between life tenant and remainderman of proceeds of condemned property, 91 ALR2d 963.

Liability, upon abandonment, for loss or expenses incurred by property owner, or for interest on award or judgment, 92 ALR2d 355.

Changes in purchasing power of money as affecting compensation, 92 ALR2d 772.

Injunction against exercise of power of eminent domain, 93 ALR2d 465.

Validity, construction and effect of specific provision of lease or statute relating to rights and compensation of lessee in event of condemnation, 96 ALR2d 1140.

Valuation at time of original wrongful entry by condemnor or at time of subsequent initiation of condemnation proceedings, 2 ALR3d 1038.

Depreciation in value, from project for which land is condemned, as a factor in fixing compensation, 5 ALR3d 901.

Right to condemn property in excess of needs for a particular public purpose, 6 ALR3d 297.

Deduction of benefits in determining compensation or damages in proceedings involving opening, widening or otherwise altering highway, 13 ALR3d 1149.

Power to condemn property or interest therein to replace other property taken for public use, 20 ALR3d 862.

Charging landowner with rent or use value of land where he remains in possession after condemnation, 20 ALR3d 1164.

Existence of restrictive covenant as element in fixing value of property condemned, 22 ALR3d 961.

Rights and liabilities of parties to executory contract for sale of land taken by eminent domain, 27 ALR3d 572.

Right to enter land for preliminary survey or examination, 29 ALR3d 1104.

Award of or pending proceedings for compensation for property condemned as precluding action for damages arising from prior trespasses upon it, 33 ALR3d 1132.

Payment or deposit of award in court as affecting condemnor's right to appeal, 40 ALR3d 203.

Propriety of court's consideration of ecological effects of proposed project in determining right of condemnation, 47 ALR3d 1267.

Traffic noise and vibration from highway as element of damages in eminent domain, 51 ALR3d 860.

Condemned property's location in relation to proposed site of building complex or similar improvement as factor in fixing compensation, 51 ALR3d 1050.

Amount of attorneys' compensation in matters involving real estate, 58 ALR3d 201.

Goodwill or “going concern” value as element of lessee's compensation for taking leasehold in eminent domain, 58 ALR3d 566.

Compensation for diminution in value of the remainder of property resulting from taking or use of adjoining land of others for the same undertaking, 59 ALR3d 488.

Eminent domain: measure and elements of lessee's compensation for condemnor's taking or damaging of leasehold, 17 ALR4th 337.

Sufficiency of condemnor's negotiations required as preliminary to taking in eminent domain, 21 ALR4th 765.

What constitutes sufficient attempt to agree on purchase or compensation, 21 ALR4th 765.

Validity, construction and application of state relocation assistance laws, 49 ALR4th 491.

Validity, construction, and effect of statute or lease provision expressly governing rights and compensation of lessee upon condemnation of leased property, 22 ALR5th 327.

29A C.J.S. Eminent Domain § 96 et seq.

§ 16-7-101.
Short title.

This act is known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Relocation Assistance Act of 1973”.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-729; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-725; W.S. 1977, §

9-17-101

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-7-102(a)(x).

§ 16-7-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Agency” means any department, agency or instrumentality of the state or of a political subdivision of the state, any department, agency or instrumentality of two (2) or more political subdivisions of the state which has the authority to acquire property by eminent domain under state law;

“Business” means any lawful activity, excepting a farm operation, conducted:

Primarily for the purchase, sale, lease and rental of personal and real property, and for the manufacture, processing or marketing of products, commodities or any other personal property;

For the sale of services to the public;

By a nonprofit organization; or

Solely for the purposes of W.S.

16-7-103

, for assisting in the purchase, sale, resale, manufacture, processing or marketing of products, commodities, personal property or services by the erection and maintenance of an outdoor advertising display, whether or not the display is located on the premises on which any of the above activities are conducted.

“Comparable replacement dwelling” means any dwelling that is:

Decent, safe and sanitary;

Adequate in size to accommodate the occupants;

Within the financial means of the displaced person;

Functionally equivalent to the displaced person’s prior dwelling;

Located in an area not subject to unreasonably adverse environmental conditions; and

In a location generally not less desirable than the location of the displaced person’s dwelling with respect to public utilities, facilities, services and the displaced person’s place of employment.

“Displaced person” means except as provided in W.S.

16-7-103

(a) and (b) and

16-7-106

:

Any person who moves from real property, or moves his personal property from real property:

As a direct result of a written notice of intent to acquire or the actual acquisition of all or part of the real property; or

Upon which the person is a residential tenant, conducts a small business, a farm operation or a business defined in W.S. 16-7-102(a)(ii)(D), as a direct result of rehabilitation, demolition or other displacing activity as the agency may prescribe under a program or project undertaken by a displacing agency in which the displacing agency determines that the displacement is permanent.

Solely for the purposes of W.S. 16-7-103(a) and (b), and

16-7-106

, any person who moves from real property or moves his personal property from real property:

As a direct result of a written notice of intent to acquire or the actual acquisition of other real property in whole or in part for a program or project undertaken by a displacing agency; or

As a direct result of rehabilitation, demolition or other displacing activity as the agency may prescribe under a program or project undertaken by a displacing agency where the displacing agency determines that the displacement is permanent.

“Displaced person” does not include:

A person who has been determined according to criteria established by the agency to be either unlawfully occupying the displacement dwelling or to have occupied the dwelling for the purpose of obtaining assistance under this act; and

Any person, other than a person who was an occupant of the property at the time it was acquired, who occupies the property on a rental basis for a short term or a period subject to termination when the property is needed for the program or project.

“Displacing agency” means an agency carrying out a program or project with federal or state financial assistance which causes a person to be a displaced person;

“Farm operation” means any activity conducted solely or primarily for the production of one (1) or more agricultural products or commodities, including timber, produced in sufficient quantity to be capable of contributing materially to the operator’s support as determined by the agency;

“Federal financial assistance” means a grant, loan, any interest reduction payment to an individual in connection with the purchase and occupancy of a residence by that individual or contribution provided by the United States, except any federal guarantee or insurance;

“Mortgage” means classes of liens commonly given to secure advances on, or the unpaid purchase price of, real property, under the laws of the state in which the real property is located together with any credit instruments;

“Nonprofit organization” means any organization, business or corporation organized under any law of this state or under the law of any other jurisdiction, for a purpose other than the conduct of business for profit, and includes corporations organized for charitable, educational, religious or social and fraternal purposes;

“This act” means W.S.

16-7-101

through

16-7-121

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-730; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-726; W.S. 1977, §

9-17-102

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 241, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Eminent Domain Act: Comment on the Act and Rule 71.1 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 739 (1983).

§ 16-7-103.
Relocation payments to displaced persons.

Whenever a program or project to be undertaken by a displacing agency will result in the displacement of any person, the displacing agency shall provide for the payment to the displaced person of:

Actual reasonable expenses in moving himself, his family, business, farm operation or other personal property;

Actual direct losses of tangible personal property as a result of moving or discontinuing a business or farm operation, but not to exceed an amount equal to the reasonable expenses that would have been required to relocate the property, as determined by the agency;

Actual reasonable expenses in searching for a replacement business or farm; and

Actual reasonable expenses necessary to reestablish a displaced farm, nonprofit organization or small business at its new site, in accordance with criteria to be established by the agency.

Any displaced person eligible for payments under subsection (a) of this section who is displaced from a dwelling and who elects to accept the payments authorized by this subsection in lieu of the payments authorized by subsection (a) of this section may receive an expense and dislocation allowance, determined according to a schedule established by the agency.

Any displaced person eligible under criteria established by the agency for payments under subsection (a) of this section who is displaced from his place of business or from his farm operation may elect to accept a fixed payment authorized by this subsection in lieu of the payment authorized by subsection (a) of this section. The fixed payment shall be determined by the agency and shall not be less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00). A person whose sole business at the displacement dwelling is the rental of the property to others shall not qualify for a payment under this subsection.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 241, § 2.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-731; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-727; W.S. 1977, §

9-17-103

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 241, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 139, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(iv) deleted “not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00).” at the end of the sentence.

§ 16-7-104.
Replacement housing payments; home owners.

In addition to payments otherwise authorized by this act, the displacing agency shall make a payment not in excess of twenty-two thousand five hundred dollars ($22,500.00) to any displaced person who is displaced from a dwelling actually owned and occupied by the displaced person for not less than one hundred eighty (180) days prior to the initiation of negotiations for the acquisition of the property. The additional payment shall include:

The amount, if any, which when added to the acquisition cost of the dwelling acquired by the displacing agency, equals the reasonable cost of a comparable replacement dwelling;

The amount, if any, which will compensate the displaced person for any increased interest costs and other debt service costs which the person is required to pay for financing the acquisition of a comparable replacement dwelling. The amount shall be paid only if the dwelling acquired by the displacing agency was encumbered by a bona fide mortgage which was a valid lien on the dwelling for not less than one hundred eighty (180) days immediately prior to the initiation of negotiations for the acquisition of the dwelling; and

Reasonable expenses incurred by the displaced person for evidence of title, recording fees and other closing costs incident to the purchase of the replacement dwelling, but not including prepaid expenses.

The additional payment authorized by this section shall be made only to a displaced person who purchases and occupies a replacement dwelling which is decent, safe and sanitary within one (1) year after the date on which he receives final payment from the displacing agent for the acquired dwelling or the date on which the obligation of the displacing agency under W.S.

16-7-107

is met, whichever is later, except that the displacing agency may extend the period for good cause. If the period is extended, the payment under this section shall be based on the costs of relocating the person to a comparable replacement dwelling within one (1) year of such date.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-732; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-728; W.S. 1977, §

9-17-104

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 241, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in the introductory paragraph of subsection (a), see § 16-7-102(a)(x).

§ 16-7-105.
Replacement housing payment; tenants.

In addition to amounts otherwise authorized by this act, a displacing agency shall make a payment to or for any displaced person displaced from any dwelling and not eligible to receive a payment under W.S.

16-7-104

, providing the displaced person actually and lawfully occupied the dwelling for not less than ninety (90) days immediately prior to:

The initiation of negotiations for acquisition of the dwelling; or

An event as prescribed by the agency in any case in which displacement is not a direct result of acquisition.

The payment under subsection (a) of this section shall consist of the amount necessary to enable the displaced person to lease or rent, for a period not to exceed forty-two (42) months a comparable replacement dwelling not to exceed five thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($5,250.00). At the discretion of the displacing agency, a payment under this subsection may be made in periodic installments. Computation of a payment under this subsection to a low-income displaced person for a comparable replacement dwelling shall take into account the person’s income.

Any person eligible for a payment under subsections (a) and (b) of this section may elect to apply the payment to a down payment including incidental expenses on the purchase of a decent, safe and sanitary replacement dwelling. That person may at the discretion of the displacing agency be eligible under this subsection for the maximum payment allowed under subsection (b) of this section, except that in the case of a displaced home owner who has owned and occupied the displacement dwelling for at least ninety (90) days but not more than one hundred eighty (180) days immediately prior to the initiation of negotiations for the acquisition of the dwelling, the payment shall not exceed the payment the person would otherwise have received under W.S. 16-7-104(a) of this act had the person owned and occupied the displacement dwelling one hundred eighty (180) days immediately prior to the initiation of the negotiations.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-733; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-729; W.S. 1977, §

9-17-105

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 241, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-7-102(a)(x).

§ 16-7-106.
Relocation assistance advisory programs; services provided.

Programs or projects undertaken by a displacing agency shall be planned in a manner that:

Recognizes at an early stage in the planning of the programs or projects and before the commencement of any actions which will cause displacements, the problems associated with the displacement of individuals, families, businesses and farm operations; and

Provides for the resolution of the problems in order to minimize adverse impacts on displaced persons and to expedite program or project advancement and completion.

Displacing agencies shall ensure that the relocation assistance advisory services described in subsection (c) of this section are made available to all persons displaced by the agency. If the agency determines that any person occupying property immediately adjacent to the property where the displacing activity occurs is caused substantial economic injury due to the activity, the agency may make available the advisory services.

Each relocation assistance advisory program required by subsection (b) of this section shall include measures, facilities or services as may be necessary or appropriate in order to:

Determine and make timely recommendations on the needs and preferences of displaced persons for relocation assistance;

Assist a person displaced from a business or farm operation in obtaining and becoming established in a suitable replacement location;

Supply:

Information concerning programs of the federal, state and local governments offering assistance to displaced persons; and

Technical assistance to persons applying for assistance under the programs.

Provide other advisory services to displaced persons in order to minimize hardships to displaced persons in adjusting to relocation;

The displacing agency shall coordinate relocation activities performed by the agency with other federal, state or local governmental actions in the community which could affect the efficient and effective delivery of relocation assistance and related services; and

Provide current and continuing information on the availability, sales prices and rental charges of comparable replacement dwellings for displaced home owners and tenants and suitable locations for businesses and farm operations.

Notwithstanding W.S. 16-7-102(a)(iv)(C) in any case in which a displacing agency acquires property for a program or project, any person who occupies the property on a rental basis for a short term or a period subject to termination when the property is needed for the program or project is eligible for advisory services to the extent determined by the displacing agency.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-734; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-730; W.S. 1977, §

9-17-106

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 241, § 1.

§ 16-7-107.
Assurance of replacement housing; waiver.

If a program or project undertaken by a displacing agency cannot proceed on a timely basis because comparable replacement dwellings are not available and the displacing agency determines that the dwellings cannot otherwise be made available, the displacing agency may take action as necessary or appropriate to provide dwellings by use of funds authorized for the project. The displacing agency may use this section to exceed the maximum amounts which may be paid under W.S.

16-7-104

and

16-7-105

on a case-by-case basis for good cause as determined in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the agency. Regulations issued pursuant to W.S.

16-7-108

may prescribe situations when these assurances may be waived.

No person shall be required to move from a dwelling due to any program or project undertaken by a displacing agency unless the displacing agency is satisfied that comparable replacement housing is available to the person.

The displacing agency shall assure that a person shall not be required to move from a dwelling unless the person has had a reasonable opportunity to relocate to a comparable replacement dwelling, except in the case of:

A major disaster as defined in the Disaster Relief Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. § 5122;

Any other emergency which requires the person to move immediately from the dwelling because continued occupancy of the dwelling by the person constitutes a substantial danger to the health or safety of the person.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-735; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-731; W.S. 1977, §

9-17-107

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 241, § 1.

§ 16-7-108.
Assurance of replacement housing; prescription of rules, regulations and procedures by governor.

The governor shall adopt rules and regulations as may be necessary under federal laws and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder to assure that:

The payments and assistance authorized by this act shall be administered in a manner which is fair and reasonable, and as uniform as practicable;

A displaced person who makes proper application for a payment authorized by this act shall be paid promptly after a move or, in hardship cases, be paid in advance; and

Any person aggrieved by a determination as to eligibility for a payment authorized by this act, or the amount of a payment, may have his application reviewed in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

The governor may prescribe other regulations and procedures, consistent with the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-736; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-732; W.S. 1977, §

9-17-108

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 16-7-102(a)(x).

§ 16-7-109.
Assurance of replacement housing; administration of relocation programs.

In order to prevent unnecessary expense and duplication of functions, and to promote uniform and effective administration of relocation assistance programs for displaced persons, with the approval of the governor the agency may enter into contracts with any person for services in connection with those programs, or may carry out its functions under this act through any federal agency or any department or instrumentality of the state or its political subdivisions having an established organization for conducting relocation assistance programs.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-737; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-733; W.S. 1977, §

9-17-109

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-7-102(a)(x).

§ 16-7-110.
Available funds.

Funds appropriated or otherwise available to any state agency or unit of local government for the acquisition of real property or any interest therein for a particular program or project shall also be available to carry out the provisions of this act as applied to that program or project.

No payment or assistance under this act shall be required to be made to any person or included as a program or project cost under this section, if the person receives a payment required by federal, state or local law which is determined by the agency to have substantially the same purpose and effect as the payment under this act.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-738; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-734; W.S. 1977, §

9-17-110

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 241, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a) and twice in subsection (b), see § 16-7-102(a)(x).

§ 16-7-111.
Available funds; state financial assistance for local relocation payments and services.

If an agency of any political subdivision of the state acquires real property, and state financial assistance is available to pay all or part of the cost of the acquisition of that real property, or of the improvement for which the property is acquired, the cost to the agency of providing the payments and services prescribed by this act shall be included as part of the costs of the project for which state financial assistance is available and the agency is eligible for state financial assistance for relocation payments and services in the same manner and to the same extent as other project costs.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-739; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-735; W.S. 1977, §

9-17-111

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-7-102(a)(x).

§ 16-7-112.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 241, § 2.

Cross references. —

For the definition of “displaced person,” see § 16-7-102(a)(iv).

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1, related to displaced persons.

§ 16-7-113.
Displacement payments not considered as income for public assistance purposes.

No payment received by a displaced person under this act is considered as income or as a resource for the purpose of determining the eligibility or extent of eligibility of any person for assistance under any state law or for the purposes of the state’s personal income tax law, corporation tax law or other tax laws. These payments are not considered as income or resources of any recipient of public assistance, and the payments shall not be deducted from the amount of aid to which the recipient would otherwise be entitled.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-741; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-737; W.S. 1977, §

9-17-113

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 16-7-102(a)(x).

§ 16-7-114.
Appeals by aggrieved persons.

Any person or business concern aggrieved by a final administrative determination pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act concerning eligibility for relocation payments authorized by this act may appeal that determination to the district court in the area in which the land taken for public use is located or in which the building code enforcement activity occurs or the voluntary rehabilitation program is conducted.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-742; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-738; W.S. 1977, §

9-17-114

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

For rules governing judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-7-102(a)(x).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 16-7-115.
Programs with federal financing; reimbursable expenses of displaced property owner.

Any agency acquiring real property for a program or project for which federal financial assistance will be available to pay all or any part of the cost of the program or project shall, as soon as practicable after the date of payment of the purchase price or the date of deposit into court of funds to satisfy the award of compensation in a condemnation proceeding to acquire real property, whichever is earlier, reimburse the owner, to the extent the acquiring agency deems fair and reasonable, for expenses he necessarily incurred for:

Recording fees, transfer taxes and similar expenses incidental to conveying such real property to the acquiring agency;

Penalty costs for prepayment for any preexisting recorded mortgage entered into in good faith encumbering such real property; and

The pro rata portion of real property taxes paid which are allocable to a period subsequent to the date of vesting title in the acquiring agency, or the effective date of possession of the real property by the acquiring agency, whichever is earlier.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-743; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-739; W.S. 1977, §

9-17-115

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 16-7-116.
Programs with federal financing; condemnation proceedings; winning owner's reimbursable litigation expenses.

If a condemnation proceeding is instituted by an agency to acquire real property for a purpose as set forth in W.S.

16-7-115

, and the final judgment is that the real property cannot be acquired by condemnation or that the proceeding is abandoned, the owner of any right, title or interest in the real property shall be paid a sum which will, in the opinion of the court, reimburse the owner for his reasonable attorney, appraisal and engineering fees actually incurred because of the condemnation proceedings. The award of the sums will be paid by the agency which sought to condemn the property.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-744; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-740; W.S. 1977, §

9-17-116

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

No attorney's fees absent final judgment. —

The landowners were not entitled to recover attorney's fees, where the court did not issue a final judgment that the land could never be acquired by condemnation, but instead merely ruled that the land could be condemned if the condemnor followed statutory requirements, and a second condemnation action was filed. Town of Wheatland v. Bellis Farms, 806 P.2d 281,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1991).

§ 16-7-117.
Programs with federal financing; inverse condemnation proceedings.

If an inverse condemnation proceeding is instituted by the owner of any right, title or interest in real property because of the alleged taking of his property for any program or project for which federal financial assistance will be available to pay all or any part of the cost of the program or project, the court, rendering a judgment for the plaintiff in the proceeding and awarding compensation for the taking of property, or attorney for the acquiring agency effecting a settlement of any proceeding, determines and awards or allows to the plaintiff, as a part of the judgment or settlement, a sum which will, in the opinion of the court or the attorney, reimburse the plaintiff for his reasonable costs, disbursements and expenses, including reasonable attorney, appraisal and engineering fees, actually incurred because of the proceeding.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-745; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-741; W.S. 1977, §

9-17-117

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-7-118.
Programs with federal financing; real property acquisition policies.

Any agency which acquires real property for a program or project for which federal financial assistance will be available to pay all or any part of the cost of the program or project shall comply with the following policies:

Every reasonable effort shall be made to acquire expeditiously real property by negotiation;

Real property shall be appraised before the initiation of negotiations, and the owner or his designated representative shall be given an opportunity to accompany the appraiser during his inspection of the property. The agency may prescribe a procedure to waive the appraisal in cases involving the acquisition by sale or donation of property with a low fair market value;

Before the initiation of negotiations for real property, an amount shall be established which is reasonably believed to be just compensation therefor, and that amount shall be offered for the property. In no event shall the amount be less than the approved appraisal of the fair market value of the property. Any decrease or increase in the fair market value of real property, prior to the date of valuation caused by the public improvement for which the property is acquired, or by the likelihood that the property would be acquired for the improvement, other than that due to physical deterioration within the reasonable control of the owner, shall be disregarded in determining the compensation for the property. The owner of the real property to be acquired shall be provided with a written statement of, and summary of the basis for, the amount established as just compensation. If appropriate, the just compensation for the real property acquired and for damages to remaining real property shall be separately stated;

No owner is required to surrender possession of real property before the agreed purchase price is paid or before there is deposited with the court, in accordance with applicable law, for the benefit of the owner, an amount not less than the approved appraisal of the fair market value of the property, or the amount of the award of compensation in the condemnation proceeding of the property;

The construction or development of a program or project for which federal financial assistance will be available to pay all or any part of the cost of the program or project shall be so scheduled that, to the greatest extent practicable, no person lawfully occupying real property shall be required to move from a dwelling (assuming a replacement dwelling will be available) or to move his business or farm operation without at least ninety (90) days written notice of the date by which the move is required;

If an owner or tenant is permitted to occupy the real property acquired on a rental basis for a short term or for a period subject to termination by the acquiring agency on short notice, the amount of rent required shall not exceed the fair rental value of the property to a short-term occupier;

In no event shall the time of condemnation be advanced, or negotiations or condemnation and the deposit of funds in court for the use of the owner be deferred, or any other action coercive in nature be taken to compel an agreement on the price to be paid for the property;

If an interest in real property is to be acquired by exercise of the power of eminent domain, formal condemnation proceedings shall be instituted. The acquiring agency shall not intentionally make it necessary for an owner to institute legal proceedings to prove the fact of the taking of his real property;

If the acquisition of only a portion of the property would leave the owner with an uneconomic remnant, the agency shall offer to acquire the remnant;

A person whose real property is being acquired in accordance with this section may, after the person has been fully informed of his right to receive just compensation for the property, donate the property, any part of the property, any interest in the property, or any compensation paid for the property to an agency, as the person shall determine;

For purposes of this section:

“Acquiring agency” means:

An agency as defined in W.S. 16-7-102(a)(i) which has the authority to acquire property by eminent domain under state law; or

An agency or person which does not have the authority to acquire property by eminent domain under state law, to the extent provided by the governor by rules and regulations.

“Appraisal” means a written statement independently and impartially prepared by a qualified appraiser setting forth an opinion of defined value of adequately described property as of a specific date supported by the presentation and analysis of relevant market information;

“Uneconomic remnant” means a parcel of real property in which the owner is left with an interest after the partial acquisition of the owner’s property and which the agency has determined has little or no value or utility to the owner.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-746; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-742; W.S. 1977, §

9-17-118

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 241, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 16-7-119.
Programs with federal financing; buildings, structures and improvements upon acquired property; acquisition of interest; compensation therefor.

If any interest in real property is acquired for a program or project for which federal assistance will be available to pay all or any part of the cost of the program or project, the acquiring agency shall acquire an equal interest in all buildings, structures or other improvements located upon the real property so acquired and which are required to be removed from the real property or which the head of the acquiring agency determines will be adversely affected by the use to which the real property will be put.

For the purpose of determining the just compensation to be paid for any building, structure or other improvement required to be acquired by subsection (a) of this section, the building, structure or other improvement is deemed to be a part of the real property to be acquired notwithstanding the right or obligation of a tenant, as against the owner of any other interest in the real property, to remove the building, structure or improvement at the expiration of his term, and the fair market value which the building, structure or improvement contributes to the fair market value of the real property to be acquired, or the fair market value of the building, structure or improvement for removal from the real property, whichever is greater, shall be paid to the tenant therefor.

Payment for buildings, structure [structures] or improvements as set forth in this section shall not result in duplication of any payments otherwise authorized by state law. No payment shall be made unless the owner of the land involved disclaims all interest in the improvements of the tenant. In consideration for any payment, the tenant shall assign, transfer and release all his right, title and interest in and to the improvements. Nothing in this section shall be construed to deprive the tenant of any rights to reject payment and to obtain payment for the property interests in accordance with other laws of the state.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-747; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-743; W.S. 1977, §

9-17-119

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-7-120.
Applicability of real property acquisition provisions.

This act applies only to acquisitions of real property by an agency for a program or project for which federal financial assistance will be available to pay all or any part of the cost of the program or project, except that if any other provision of state law is applicable to the acquisitions, and the provision of state law requires relocation payments and assistance or prescribes land acquisition policies which are equivalent to or are greater or more stringent than the payments, assistance or policies specified by this act, the other provision of state law applies to the acquisitions.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-748; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-744; W.S. 1977, §

9-17-120

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in this section, see § 16-7-102(a)(x).